Colorado statutes. TITLE 27 Behavioral Health
PART 3
BEHAVIORAL HEALTH ACCESS TO CARE OMBUDSMAN

27-80-301. Short title.

The short title of this part 3 is the "Behavioral Health Access to Care Ombudsman Act".

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire part added, (HB 18-1357), ch. 252, p. 1548, § 1, effective August 8.

27-80-302. Definitions.

As used in this part 3, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Health-care provider" or "provider" means:

A professional person, as defined in section 27-65-102 (27);

A mental health professional licensed or certified under article 245 of title 12;

Any other health-care provider regulated by the state when engaged in assisting consumers with behavioral health-care access and coverage issues; or

A health-care facility licensed pursuant to section 25-1.5-103, when the facility is engaged in assisting consumers with behavioral health-care access and coverage issues.

"Office" means the office of the ombudsman for behavioral health access to care created in section 27-80-303.

"Ombudsman" means the individual designated pursuant to section 27-80-303 as the ombudsman for behavioral health access to care.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire part added, (HB 18-1357), ch. 252, p. 1548, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2019:

(1)(b) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1714, § 202, effective October 1.

L. 2022:

(1)(a) amended, (HB 22-1256), ch. 451, p. 3237, § 45, effective August 10.

27-80-303. Office of ombudsman for behavioral health access to care - creation - appointment of ombudsman - duties.

There is created in the office of the executive director of the department the office of the ombudsman for behavioral health access to care for the purpose of assisting Coloradans in accessing behavioral health care. The office of the ombudsman for behavioral health access to care is a type 1 entity, as defined in section 24-1-105.

The office of behavioral health in the department and the BHA shall offer the office limited support with respect to:

Personnel matters;

Recruitment;

Payroll;

Benefits;

Budget submission, as needed;

Accounting;

Office space, facilities, and technical support; and

Administrative support that will help maintain the independence of the office.

The office operates with full independence and has complete autonomy, control, and authority over operations, budget, and personnel decisions related to the office and the ombudsman, subject to state personnel and fiscal rules. The office may seek, accept, and expend gifts, grants, or donations for the purpose of operating the office. The department may, but is not required to, provide funding to the office.

By November 1, 2018, the governor shall designate an ombudsman for behavioral health access to care, who shall serve as director of the office. The ombudsman shall serve as a neutral party to help consumers, including consumers who are uninsured or have public or private health benefit coverage, including coverage that is not subject to state regulation, and health-care providers, acting on their own behalf, on behalf of a consumer with the consumer's written permission, or on behalf of a group of health-care providers, navigate and resolve issues and ensure compliance regarding consumer access to behavioral health care, including care for mental health conditions and substance use disorders.

The ombudsman shall:

Interact with consumers and health-care providers with concerns or complaints to help the consumers and providers resolve behavioral health-care access and coverage issues;

Identify, track, and report to the appropriate regulatory or oversight agency concerns, complaints, and potential violations of state or federal rules, regulations, or statutes concerning the availability of, and terms and conditions of, benefits for mental health conditions or substance use disorders, including potential violations related to quantitative and nonquantitative treatment limitations;

Receive and assist consumers and providers in reporting concerns and filing complaints with appropriate regulatory or oversight agencies relating to inappropriate care, a procedure for an emergency mental health hold pursuant to section 27-65-106, a certification for short-term treatment pursuant to section 27-65-109, or a certification for long-term care and treatment pursuant to section 27-65-110;

Provide appropriate information to help consumers obtain behavioral health care;

Develop appropriate points of contact for referrals to other state and federal agencies;

Provide appropriate information to help consumers or health-care providers file appeals or complaints with the appropriate entities, including insurers and other state and federal agencies; and

Be the appointing authority for any employees the office may choose to hire. Any such employees are state employees subject to the state personnel system.

The ombudsman, employees of the office, and any persons acting on behalf of the office shall comply with all state and federal confidentiality laws that govern the department and the BHA with respect to the treatment of confidential information or records and the disclosure of such information and records.

In the performance of the ombudsman's duties, the ombudsman shall act independently of the office of behavioral health in the department and the BHA. Any recommendations made or positions taken by the ombudsman do not reflect those of the department, the office of behavioral health, or the BHA.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire part added, (HB 18-1357), ch. 252, p. 1549, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2021:

(1)(b), (1)(c), (2), (3)(e), and (3)(f) amended and (3)(g) added, (SB 21-137), ch. 362, p. 2380, § 25, effective June 28.

L. 2022:

(1)(a), IP(1)(b), (4), and (5) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1567, § 173 effective July 1; (1)(a) amended, (SB 22-162), ch. 469, p. 3379, § 79, effective August 10; (3)(c) amended, (HB 22-1256), ch. 451, p. 3237, § 46, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (1)(a) by SB 22-162 and HB 22-1278 were harmonized.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Behavioral Health Recovery Act of 2021") and the legislative declaration in SB 21-137, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 362, Session Laws of Colorado 2021. For the short title (the "Debbie Haskins 'Administrative Organization Act of 1968' Modernization Act") in SB 22-162, see section 1 of chapter 469, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

27-80-304. Liaisons - department - commissioner of insurance.

The commissioner of insurance and the executive director of the department shall each appoint a liaison to the ombudsman to receive reports of concerns, complaints, and potential violations described in section 27-80-303 (3)(b) from the ombudsman, consumers, or health-care providers.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire part added, (HB 18-1357), ch. 252, p. 1551, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1568, § 174, effective July 1.

27-80-305. Qualified immunity.

The ombudsman and employees or persons acting on behalf of the office are immune from suit and liability, either personally or in their official capacities, for any claim for damage to or loss of property, or for personal injury or other civil liability caused by or arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within the scope of employment, duties, or responsibilities pertaining to the office, including issuing reports or recommendations; except that nothing in this section protects those persons from suit or liability for damage, loss, injury, or liability caused by the intentional or willful and wanton misconduct of the person.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire part added, (HB 18-1357), ch. 252, p. 1551, § 1, effective August 8.

27-80-306. Annual report.

On or before September 1, 2020, and on or before September 1 of each year thereafter, the ombudsman shall prepare and submit, in accordance with subsection (2) of this section, a written report that includes information from the preceding fiscal year concerning actions taken by the ombudsman relating to the duties of the office set forth in section 27-80-303.

The ombudsman shall submit the report required by this section to the governor, the executive director of the department and the commissioner of the BHA, the commissioner of insurance, the senate committee on health and human services or any successor committee, and the house of representatives committees on health and insurance and public and behavioral health and human services or any successor committees. Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), the reporting requirement set forth in this section continues indefinitely.

The ombudsman shall post the annual report on the BHA's website.

The ombudsman shall not include in the report required by this section any personally identifying information about an individual consumer or health-care provider or identifying information about a health-care facility licensed pursuant to section 25-1.5-103 or an emergency medical services facility, as defined in section 27-65-102.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire part added, (HB 18-1357), ch. 252, p. 1551, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2022:

(2) and (3) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1568, § 175, effective July 1; (4) amended, (HB 22-1256), ch. 451, p. 3237, § 47, effective August 10.